Utah statutes.
19-6-421.   Third party payment restrictions and requirements.

(1)  If there are sufficient revenues in the fund, and subject to the provisions of Sections 19-6-419, 19-6-422, and 19-6-423, the director shall authorize payment from the fund to third parties regarding a release covered by the fund as provided in Subsection (2) if:

(a) (i)  he is notified that a final judgment or award has been entered against the responsible party covered by the fund that determines liability for bodily injury or property damage to third parties caused by a release from the tank; or

(ii)  approved by the state risk manager, the responsible party has agreed to pay an amount in settlement of a claim arising from the release; and

(b)  the responsible party has failed to satisfy the judgment or award, or pay the amount agreed to.

(2)  The director shall authorize payment to the third parties of the amount of the judgment, award, or amount agreed to subject to the limitations established in Section 19-6-419.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

